Washington statutes.
RCW 38.20.020

City may acquire armory site.

Any city in the state of Washington in which a unit of the national guard is stationed, or is to be stationed, is hereby authorized and empowered to acquire a site for an armory by gift or purchase, and to construct an armory thereon, and to issue and sell its general obligation bonds for said purposes, within the debt limits prescribed by the Constitution, with full power to sell or lease the same to the state of Washington or to the United States.

[ 1933 ex.s. c 16 s 1; RRS s 8598-1.]